Utah statutes.
40-10-12.   Revised permit and reclamation plan -- Application -- Transfer,
assignment, or sale of rights -- Revision or modification of permit
provisions.
(1) (a)  During the term of the permit, the permittee may submit an
application for a revision of the permit, together with a revised reclamation
plan, to the division.
(b)  An application for a revision of a permit shall not be approved unless
the division finds that reclamation as required by this chapter can be
accomplished under the revised reclamation plan.
(c)  The revision shall be approved or disapproved within a period of time
established by the division.
(d) (i)  The division shall establish guidelines determining the scale or
extent of a revision request for which all permit application information,
requirements, and procedures, including notice and hearings, shall apply.
(ii)  Any revisions that propose significant alterations in the reclamation
plan shall, at a minimum, be subject to notice and hearing requirements.
(e)  Any extensions to the area covered by the permit, except incidental
boundary revisions, must be made by:
(i)  an application for a significant revision of the permit; or
(ii)  an application for another permit.
(2)  No transfer, assignment, or sale of the rights granted under any permit
issued according to this chapter shall be made without the written approval of
the division.
(3) (a)  The division shall, within a time limit prescribed in rules adopted
by the board, review outstanding permits and may require reasonable revision
or modification of the permit provisions during the term of the permit.
(b)  The revision or modification shall be:
(i)  based upon a written finding; and
(ii)  subject to notice and hearing requirements established by this chapter.
